Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-4215.02
Qualified trade adjustment assistance eligible individual, defined.

Qualified trade adjustment assistance eligible individual shall mean an individual who is eligible for the credit for health insurance costs under section 35 of the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 2004, LB 1047, § 11.